It looks like there is a Russian propaganda campaign to convince people the dossier is true (or trick people into thinking the whole thing is true):


http://www.vanityfair.com/news/2017/01/donald-trump-russia-report-intelligence-community
	by Abigail Tracy 

	At the same time, the fact that the nation’s top intelligence officials chose to present a summary version of the dossier to both President Obama and President-elect Trump, as CNN reports they did last week, indicates that they may have had a relatively high degree of confidence that at least some of the claims therein were credible, or at least worth investigating further. “My general take is that the intelligence community and law enforcement seem to be taking these claims seriously. That itself is highly significant. But it is not the same as these allegations being verified,” Susan Hennessey a former lawyer for the National Security Administration, told Wired. “Even if this was an intelligence community document—which it isn’t—this kind of raw intelligence is still treated with skepticism.” Former N.S.A. analyst John Schindler made a similar argument on Twitter, writing that the intelligence community “would never touch an outside, private Intel report, much less briefed it to ‘the top,’ unless key parts could be corroborated.”

https://www.reddit.com/r/russianpropaganda/comments/5tqnbz/john_schindlers_conduct_is_consistent_with_being/
	John Schindler's conduct is consistent with being a Kremlin propagandist

http://www.vanityfair.com/news/2017/06/donald-trump-nato-article-5
	by Abigail Tracy 

	Of course we believe in Article 5,” United Nations Ambassador Nikki Haley said on Sunday during an interview with CNN’s State of the Union. Secretary of Defense James Mattis argued that Trump’s mere appearance before NATO leaders indicated that he was dedicated to the alliance. “He was there to show our statement that we are standing with the NATO allies 100 percent,” Mattis said at a security conference in Singapore on Saturday. National Security Adviser H.R. McMaster took his defense of Trump’s speech one step further. “I think it’s extraordinary that there would be an expectation that the president would have to say explicitly that he supports Article 5. Of course he does,” McMaster told reporters at the end of a Group of Seven summit in Sicily. “He did not make a decision not to say it. It was implicit in the speech. There was no decision to not put it in there.”

(Article 5 is the whole point of NATO. Trump claims to understand and support NATO, at least for fighting terrorism: http://thehill.com/policy/international/330245-trump-didnt-know-much-about-nato-when-he-called-it-obsolete-report)

http://www.vanityfair.com/news/2016/12/joe-biden-presidential-election-2020
	Why Biden 2020 Isn’t As Crazy As It Sounds

	by Abigail Tracy

	...Biden harkens superficially back to an older, whiter time

	...Sure, he’d be pushing 80 by the time he returned to lead the country.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/11/us/politics/trump-intelligence-report-explainer.html
	What We Know and Don’t Know About the Trump-Russia Dossier

	By SCOTT SHANE

	Last June, after evidence of Russian hacking of Democratic targets surfaced, Fusion GPS **hired a retired British intelligence officer**, Christopher Steele, to investigate Mr. Trump’s ties to Russia.

	...Mr. Steele, who had long experience in Russia and a network of connections there, compiled **dozens of reports** detailing what he heard from his contacts. The memos he wrote, mostly one to three pages long, are dated from June to December.

	...The memos contain **unsubstantiated claims that Russian officials tried to obtain influence over Mr. Trump** by preparing to blackmail him with sex tapes and bribe him with business deals.

	...Fusion GPS and Mr. Steele shared the memos first with their clients, and later with the F.B.I. and multiple journalists at The New York Times and elsewhere.

	The memos, totaling about 35 pages, also **reached a number of members of Congress.**

 	Last week, when **the F.B.I., C.I.A. and National Security Agency gave a classified report** on the Russian hacking, leaking and efforts to influence the presidential election to Mr. Obama, Mr. Trump and congressional leaders, they attached a two-page summary of the unverified allegations in the memos.

	...Whether any of the claims in the memos are true. American intelligence agencies have not confirmed them, and **Mr. Trump has said they are a complete fabrication.**

	...Who concocted the information in the memos, if it is entirely false or partly so, and with what purpose. If all the information in the dossier is false, it **is a very sophisticated fabrication.**

	What exactly prompted American intelligence officials to pass on a summary of the unvetted claims to Mr. Obama, Mr. Trump and Congress. Officials have said they felt the president-elect should be aware of the memos, which had circulated widely in Washington. But putting the summary in a report that went to multiple people in Congress and the executive branch made it **very likely that it would be leaked.**

	...So what changed on Tuesday? Why is this now being reported?

	CNN broke the news that a summary of the memos had been attached to the classified report by the F.B.I., C.I.A. and National Security Agency on the Russian hacking and leaking, and that it had been given to Mr. Obama, Mr. Trump and congressional leaders last week. That level of official attention prompted news organizations to decide to inform the public about the memos.

http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/29/world/europe/29spy.html
	In Ordinary Lives, U.S. Sees the Work of Russian Agents

	By SCOTT SHANE and CHARLIE SAVAGE JUNE 28, 2010 

	The alleged agents were directed to gather information on nuclear weapons, American policy toward Iran, C.I.A. leadership, Congressional politics and many other topics, prosecutors say. The Russian spies made contact with a former high-ranking American national security official and a nuclear weapons researcher, among others. But the charges did not include espionage, and it was unclear what secrets the suspected spy ring — which included five couples — actually managed to collect.

	...“The magnitude, and the fact that so many illegals were involved, was a shock to me,” said Oleg D. Kalugin, a former K.G.B. general who was a Soviet spy in the United States in the 1960s and 1970s under “legal” cover as a diplomat and Radio Moscow correspondent. “It’s a return to the old days, but even in the worst years of the cold war, I think there were no more than 10 illegals in the U.S., probably fewer.”


http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2017/01/donald-trump-intelligence-report-buzzfeed-cnn-coup-214623
	The Coup Before the Inauguration

	To hear Donald Trump tell it, BuzzFeed and CNN teamed up with a rogue intelligence community to slime him and destroy his presidency. But what other choice did they have?

	By Jack Shafer January 11, 2017

	...If you’re asking if I would have published the raw report if I had been sitting in the editor Ben Smith’s BuzzFeed cockpit, the answer is yes. No competent journalist publishes oppo research without confirming and placing it in context, so I stand with the major news organizations that did not publish during the campaign. But when such a report is flung about by people in power, as this one was, and its allegations are beginning to inform governance, more damage is done to trust in government and confidence in journalism by withholding it from public scrutiny.

	...Perhaps the leading indicator that the dossier isn’t pure invention comes from Russia itself, which has officially announced that the report is “pulp fiction” and an “absolute fabrication.” A Kremlin spokesman said, “The Kremlin has no compromising information on Trump.” Oh, come on! The Kremlin must have some compromising information on everybody in the U.S. within reach of the tendrils of power, especially folks like Trump who have traveled there. The Russians are protesting a tad too much. Hell, the Kremlin probably has compromising information on your mother.

http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2017/05/17/hr-mcmaster-trump-leak-russian-classified-intel-215149
	H.R. McMaster Takes a Dive
	The national security adviser’s fanboys are having a sad over his shilling for Baby Donald.
	By Jack Shafer  May 17


http://www.motherjones.com/kevin-drum/2017/03/dossier-looking-more-credible-all-time/
	The Trump “Dossier” Is Looking More Credible All the Time
	Kevin Drum
	Mar. 30, 2017

		...The most explosive allegation that the dossier says originally came from Millian is the claim that Trump had hired prostitutes at the Moscow Ritz-Carlton and that the Kremlin has kept evidence of the encounter.

	Nobody knows for sure if Millian is genuinely plugged in at high levels, or if he’s just a fast-talking huckster. But put all this together and it’s easy to see why the Trump-Russia story won’t go away. The FBI believes Steele to be credible. In the cases where it’s been possible to check out the allegations in the dossier, they’ve turned out to be true. Other intelligence corroborates much of the alleged Russian activity. And Millian’s claims are genuinely explosive.

http://www.motherjones.com/kevin-drum/2017/05/mcmaster-trumps-blabbing-was-totally-appropriate
	McMaster: Trump's Blabbing Was "Wholly Appropriate"
	Kevin Drum  May 16


http://www.cnn.com/2017/04/18/politics/fbi-dossier-carter-page-donald-trump-russia-investigation/index.html
	FBI used dossier allegations to bolster Trump-Russia investigation

	By Evan Perez, Shimon Prokupecz and Manu Raju, CNN

http://www.cnn.com/2017/02/10/politics/russia-dossier-update/index.html
	US investigators corroborate some aspects of the Russia dossier

	By Jim Sciutto and Evan Perez, CNN

https://web.archive.org/web/20100704035145/http://blogs.wsj.com:80/washwire/2010/06/29/alleged-russian-spies-a-novel-idea/
	Alleged Russian Spies: A Novel Idea?

	By Evan Perez

	The criminal complaints filed by U.S. prosecutors don’t portray any significant U.S. secrets that may have been compromised by the agents; in fact FBI wiretaps captured two of them discussing that they likely couldn’t pass vetting if they tried to get a U.S. government job. 


http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/what-happened-donald-trumps-russia-scandal
	What happened to Donald Trump’s Russia scandal?
	02/10/17 04:15 PM
	By Steve Benen

	In the meantime, Russia is taking steps that make it seem as if some in Putin’s government believe the details in the now-infamous dossier may be true.

http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/trumps-national-security-advisor-comes-the-wrong-defense
	 Trump’s National Security Advisor comes up with the wrong defense
	 By Steve Benen  May 16


https://patribotics.blog/2017/02/26/planespotting-michael-cohens-amazing-journey-louise-mensch/
	Planespotting: Michael Cohen’s Amazing Journey

	When the Steele dossier was published by Buzzfeed, with an entirely appropriate amount of caveats, other journalistic outlets rushed to pour cold water on it, and wrongly so.

	Chief among these was CNN. Acting as if Buzzfeed had not offered caveats alongside the publication, CNN blasted the news site as though they had irresponsibly published ‘fake news’.


http://money.cnn.com/2017/05/17/media/fbi-raid-orrin-hatch-russian-election-meddling/index.html
	How an FBI raid fed a rumor that Orrin Hatch was about to become president

	For a moment last week, a part of the Internet thought Utah Senator Orrin Hatch was on the verge of becoming president of the United States.

	On Thursday, in a pair of unproven reports on her website Patribotics, Mensch wrote that Hatch was "likely to become president" should President Trump be removed from office -- because, she said, Trump and the next two people in the Constitutional line of succession were likely swept up in the Russian plot to sway the US election and, thus, ineligible for the presidency. 


http://www.businessinsider.com/trump-russia-dossier-fbi-investigation-2017-3
	The FBI is reportedly using the explosive Trump-Russia dossier as a 'roadmap' for its investigation
	Natasha Bertrand

	The relationship was so "chummy" that the FBI offered to pay Steele to continue his work in October, The Washington Post reported last month.

https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/fbi-once-planned-to-pay-former-british-spy-who-authored-controversial-trump-dossier/2017/02/28/896ab470-facc-11e6-9845-576c69081518_story.html
	...Ultimately, the FBI did not pay Steele.

	...Those people say Steele’s frustration with the FBI peaked after an Oct. 31 New York Times story that cited law enforcement sources drawing conclusions that he considered premature. The article said that the FBI had not yet found any “conclusive or direct link” between Trump and the Russian government and that the Russian hacking was not intended to help Trump.

	...“The [intelligence community] has not made any judgment that the information in this document is reliable, and we did not rely upon it in any way for our conclusions,” then-Director of National Intelligence James R. Clapper Jr. said in a statement in January.

http://www.businessinsider.com/carter-page-fbi-dossier-fisa-warrant-case-2017-4
	We just got a huge sign that the US intelligence community believes the Trump dossier is legitimate
   	Natasha Bertrand

https://finance.yahoo.com/news/national-security-experts-trumps-sharing-135600288.html
	National security experts: Trump's sharing classified info with Russia 'may breach his oath of office'
	Natasha Bertrand

	..."This story is nauseating," Benjamin Wittes, a senior fellow in Governance Studies at The Brookings Institution, posted on Twitter along with a link to The Washington Post's bombshell story. "You might have to work with natsec," or national security, "people to understand how bad it is, but it's horrible. Really really bad."

http://www.businessinsider.my/mcmaster-trump-russia-classified-information-2017-5/
	Trump’s national security adviser: He ‘wasn’t even aware’ of where information he shared with Russians came from

	Natasha Bertrand 

	...McMaster did not confirm whether the information Trump disclosed was classified, or if it came from a US ally. But he suggested Trump did not intend to reveal classified information because he “did not even know where that information came from.” 

https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/16/mcmaster_national_security_put_at_risk_by_leaks_like_washington_post_story.html
	QUESTION: General, when you came out after the story broke, you said that the president did not disclose any sources or methods. He did not reveal anything about military operations. Why were you denying things that were not even reported? What the report said is that the president revealed classified information that had been shared by one of our allies in the Middle East. So the question is simply a yes or no question here. Did the president share classified information with the Russians in that meeting?

	MCMASTER: As I mentioned already, we don't say what's classified, what's not classified. What I will tell you again is that what the president shared was wholly appropriate. The story -- the story combined what was leaked with other information and then -- and the insinuated about sources and methods. So I wanted to make clear to everybody that the president in no way compromised any sources or methods in the course of this conversation.


But some major claims in the dossier don't hold up. A lot of the dossier is about a momentous secret meeting between Russian officials and Trump lawyer Micheal Cohen and that allegedly took place in August 2016 in Prague:


https://archive.org/stream/TrumpIntelligenceAllegations_201701/Trump-Intelligence-Allegations_djvu.txt
	Speaking to a compatriot and friend on 19 October 2016, a Kremlin insider provided further details of reported clandestine meeting/ s between Republican presidential candidate, Donald TRUMP'S lawyer Michael COHEN and Kremlin representatives in August 2016. Although the communication between them had to be cryptic for security reasons, the Kremlin insider clearly indicated to his/her friend that the reported contact /s took place in Prague, Czech Republic.

	...Rossotrudnichestvo was being used as cover for this relationship and its office in Prague may well have been used to host the COHEN / Russian Presidential Administration (PA) meeting /s. It was considered a "plausibly deniable" vehicle for this, whilst remaining entirely under Kremlin control. 

	...KOSACHEV, also "plausibly deniable" being part of the Russian legislature rather than executive, had facilitated the contact in Prague and by implication, may have attended the meeting/ s with COHEN there in August.

	...US/RUSSIA: FURTHER DETAILS OF SECRET DIALOGUE BETWEEN TRUMP CAMPAIGN TEAM, KREMLIN AND ASSOCIATED HACKERS IN PRAGUE 

	- TRUMP’s representative COHEN accompanied to Prague in August/September 2016 by 3 colleagues for secret discussions with Kremlin representatives and associated operators/hackers 

	1. We reported previously (2016/135 and /136) on secret meeting/s held in Prague, Czech Republic in August 2016 between then Republican presidential candidate Donald TRUMP's representative, Michael COHEN and his interlocutors from the Kremlin working under cover of Russian 'NGO' Rossotrudnichestvo. 

	...COHEN had been accompanied to Prague by 3 colleagues and the timing of the visit was either in the last week of August or the first week of September. One of their main Russian interlocutors was Oleg SOLODUKHIN operating under Rossotrudnichestvo cover. According the agenda comprised questions on how deniable cash payments were to be made to hackers who had worked in Europe under Kremlin direction against the CLINTON campaign and various contingencies for covering up these operations and Moscow's secret liaison with the TRUMP team more generally. 

	In Prague, COHEN agreed contingency plans for various scenarios to protect the operation

	...We reported earlier that the involvement of political operatives Paul MANAFORT and Carter PAGE in the secret TRUMP- Kremlin liaison had been exposed in the media in the run-up to Prague and that damage limitation of these also was discussed by COHEN with the Kremlin representatives


But Czech intelligence said they found no evidence Cohen travelled to Prague:


https://www.rferl.org/a/czech-intelligence-trump-lawyer-prague-meeting/28226228.html
	January 11, 2017 15:27 GMT 

	PRAGUE -- A Czech investigative journal quotes local intelligence officers as saying they have no evidence that a lawyer for President-elect Donald Trump traveled to the Czech capital last year, potentially dealing a blow to a claim at the center of an unverified text suggesting Russia had compromising materials on the billionaire developer.

	The lawyer, Michael Cohen, has already dismissed reports that he met in Prague with Russian agents over possible influence on the 2016 presidential election, and said he has never been to the city.

	A Czech intelligence source told the Respekt magazine that there is no record of Cohen arriving in Prague by plane, although the news weekly pointed out he could have traveled by car or train from a nearby EU country, avoiding passport control under Schengen zone travel rules.

	"If there was such a meeting, he [Cohen] didn’t arrive in the Czech Republic by plane," the source said.


nor did the FBI:


https://www.wsj.com/articles/spy-agencies-investigating-claims-trump-advisers-worked-with-russian-agents-1484101731
	Spy Agencies Investigating Claims Trump Advisers Worked With Russian Agents

	By Shane Harris, Devlin Barrett and Alan Cullison

	U.S. intelligence agencies and the Federal Bureau of Investigation have spent months trying to substantiate explosive claims, compiled by a former Western intelligence official, that Russian government operatives engaged in an extensive conspiracy with advisers to Donald Trump's presidential campaign and employees of his company, people familiar with the matter said.

	...The FBI has found no evidence that he traveled to the Czech Republic, where the meeting allegedly took place in August of last year, officials said.


and CNN reports that it was a different Micheal Cohen who went to Prague:


https://twitter.com/jaketapper/status/819187673961287681?lang=en
	6:22 AM - 11 Jan 2017

	In this uncorroborated report it talks about Micheal Cohen Trump's official corporate lawyer making a trip to the Czech Republic. My reporting suggests that people did try to run that down and they concluded that it was a different Micheal Cohen. It was a Micheal Cohen with a passport from another country; the same birth year, different birth date. So for Micheal Cohen to dispute that he was in the Czech Republic completely confirms and comports with our reporting, and its one of the reasons why the intelligence chiefs did not get specific with these allegations, and that's why I hope at the press conference today people are more general and don't get into the specifics because a lot of that stuff just has not been proven.


A lot of the dossier's claims don't make sense:


https://archive.org/stream/TrumpIntelligenceAllegations_201701/Trump-Intelligence-Allegations_djvu.txt
	The reason for using WikiLeaks was "plausible deniability” and the operation had been conducted with the full knowledge and support of TRUMP and senior members of his campaign team. In return the TRUMP team had agreed to sideline Russian intervention in Ukraine as a campaign issue and to raise US/NATO defence commitments in the Baltics and Eastern Europe to deflect attention away from Ukraine, a priority for PUTIN who needed to cauterise the subject. 


If this was Putin's plan, it wasn't a very good one. All Trump did was draw attention to Ukraine:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/global-opinions/trump-campaign-guts-gops-anti-russia-stance-on-ukraine/2016/07/18/98adb3b0-4cf3-11e6-a7d8-13d06b37f256_story.html
	Trump campaign guts GOP’s anti-Russia stance on Ukraine


https://qz.com/650201/donald-trump-hired-an-advisor-to-ukraines-notorious-former-president-putin-buddy-viktor-yanukovych/
	Donald Trump has hired an experienced political operative to help wrangle GOP delegates: Paul Manafort, a strategist with three decades of Republican conventions under his belt, who has also worked for some unsavory international clients.

	That roster includes the pro-Russian former president of Ukraine, Viktor Yanukovych, who was deposed in a popular revolution in 2013.


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2016/dec/06/ukraine-trump-presidency-russia-putin
	'It's a pretty disturbing time for Ukraine': Trump's Russia ties unnerve Kiev 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/760095370185674752
	When I said in an interview that Putin is "not going into Ukraine, you can mark it down," I am saying if I am President. Already in Crimea!


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/831846101179314177
	Crimea was TAKEN by Russia during the Obama Administration. Was Obama too soft on Russia?


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/820789938887294977
	much worse - just look at Syria (red line), Crimea, Ukraine and the build-up of Russian nukes. Not good! Was this the leaker of Fake News?


Trump doesn't sounds like someone who "agreed to sideline Ukraine" in some kind of deal. He comes off as an obsequious Putin fan who doesn't know what he's doing:


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862788002594127873/photo/1
	Yesterday, on the same day- I had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov and the FM of Ukraine, Pavlo Klimkin. #LetsMakePeace!


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/814919370711461890
	Great move on delay (by V. Putin) - I always knew he was very smart!


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/347191326112112640
	Do you think Putin will be going to The Miss Universe Pageant in November in Moscow - if so, will he become my new best friend?

	8:17 PM - 18 Jun 2013


And Trump has been convinced "other countries are ripping us off" for decades:


http://www.apnewsarchive.com/1987/Trump-U-S-Should-Stop-Paying-To-Defend-Countries-that-Can-Protect-Selves/id-05133dbe63ace98766527ec7d16ede08
	Sep. 1, 1987 

	NEW YORK (AP) _ Real estate developer Donald J. Trump bought full-page ads in three major U.S. newspapers to say the United States should stop paying to defend countries that can afford to protect themselves.

	The advertisements appeared in Wednesday's New York Times, Washington Post and Boston Globe at a total cost of $94,801, said Trump spokesman Daniel Klores.

	The ads bore the headline, ''There's nothing wrong with America's Foreign Defense Policy that a little backbone can't cure.''

	''For decades, Japan and other nations have been taking advantage of the United States'' and that it has been costing this nation in terms of the economy, deficit and taxes, the ad said. ''The saga continues unabated as we defend the Persian Gulf.''

	Trump described the Gulf as ''an area of only marginal significance to the United States for its oil supplies, but one upon which Japan and others are almost totally dependent.''

	''Why are these nations not paying the United States for the human lives and billions of dollars we are losing to protect their interests? ... The world is laughing at America's politicians as we protect ships we don't own, carrying oil we don't need, destined for allies who won't help.''

	Trump's name has been mentioned for various public offices, including mayor of New York City, governor and the presidency.

	Asked if Trump's letter had anything to do with political aspirations, Klores said, ''Right now Donald Trump has no ambition to seek political office of any kind.'' 


https://votesmart.org/public-statement/367/discusses-his-bid-for-the-reform-party-presidential-nomination-interview
	Oct. 24, 1999

	MR. TRUMP: Well, I mean, I think there is a certain controversy to me. And I am single. And I do go out with women. And I do respect and adore women. And some women love me and probably some women don’t. But I am certainly controversial. But I also am a great businessman. I’d make the greatest treaties that this country has seen in a long time. Other countries wouldn’t be ripping us off like they’re doing, when you look at what Japan has been doing to us for so many years and decades. I mean, they wouldn’t be ripping us like they are, and things would happen.


http://www.cnn.com/ALLPOLITICS/stories/1999/10/08/trump.transcript/
	October 8, 1999

	I am for whatever it takes. We have the money. The fact is, that the world is ripping off this country: Germany is ripping us off big league; Saudi Arabia is ripping us off big league; France, I mean, they’re the worst team player I’ve ever seen in my life. You look at what’s happened, Japan, for years, I mean, we’re like a whipping post for Japan.


http://www.foxnews.com/transcript/2011/04/15/exclusive-donald-trump-rips-into-president-obama-past/
	Published April 15, 2011

	HANNITY: And what have you come up with your investigators?

	TRUMP: Well, I don’t want to say that now. But it is going to be very interesting. But I don’t want to say it now, Sean. But I will say this, I don’t love this issue. I’d much rather be talking about how China is ripping us off, how OPEC is — that’s what I’m really good at. I understand it. I can do such a great job.


http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/2016/03/27/americas-allies-are-ripping-us-off-says-donald-trump/
	27 March 2016 • 8:52pm

	America’s allies are “ripping us off” says Donald Trump


And he has long held warm feelings toward the Russian government:


http://www.nytimes.com/1987/07/03/nyregion/trump-wins-approval-for-3d-casino-in-jersey.html
	July 3, 1987

	Mr. Trump also said he would leave Friday for Moscow to pursue an invitation to build a hotel across from the Kremlin. 

	...Of the Moscow project, Mr. Trump said he did not know how large the hotel would be. He plans to be in Moscow for six days as a guest of the Government to examine the site and look into details. He said it would be his first trip to the Soviet Union. Kremlin Wants a Trump Tower

	The New York developer said the Soviet Government wanted a hotel ''with the feel of Trump Tower.'' 


http://www.slate.com/articles/news_and_politics/the_spectator/2016/03/trump_s_nuclear_experience_advice_for_reagan_in_1987.html
	So what is the deal Trump thinks can be done? What is the Trump Plan?

	It’s a deal with the Soviets. We approach them on this basis: We both recognize the nonproliferation treaty’s not working, that half a dozen countries are on the brink of getting a bomb. Which can only cause trouble for the two of us. The deterrence of mutual assured destruction that prevents the United States and the USSR from nuking each other won’t work on the level of an India-Pakistan nuclear exchange. Or a madman dictator with a briefcase-bomb team. The only answer is for the Big Two to make a deal now to step in and prevent the next generation of nations about to go nuclear from doing so. By whatever means necessary.

	“Most of those [pre-nuclear] countries are in one form or another dominated by the U.S. and the Soviet Union,” Trump says. “Between those two nations you have the power to dominate any of those countries. So we should use our power of economic retaliation and they use their powers of retaliation and between the two of us we will prevent the problem from happening.


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/russia-trump-political-conflict-zone/story?id=42263092
	There is ample evidence in Russian media from that period in the 2000s that brokers mounted a significant effort to attract buyers to Trump properties in Florida, Toronto and New York. And Trump and his children participated in those campaigns.
	
	During the marketing of the Trump SoHo project, in which Trump licensed his name to a group that included Russian investors, the Trump family met with a group of Russian journalists at their New York offices to help boost interest in the project, according to Russian media reports. During the meeting, Trump was quoted telling the gathering of Russian journalists: “I really like Vladimir Putin. I respect him. He does his work well. Much better than our Bush.”


Reading between the lines, it sounds like Trump's position on NATO being "obsolete" might have something to do with his feelings about Russia:


http://ktla.com/2017/04/12/trump-reverses-position-says-nato-no-longer-obsolete/
	Trump said Wednesday he’d changed views after NATO’s leaders assured him the group would turn its attention to combating groups like ISIS going forward.

	“The secretary general and I had a productive discussion about what more NATO can do in the fight against terrorism,” Trump said. “I complained about that a long time ago, and they made a change and now they do fight terrorism.”


(e.g. "the Warsaw pact dissolved, so NATO is obsolete!")


In sum, Putin wouldn't need to make a deal with Trump to "raise US/NATO defence commitments." He'd do it on his own (or with some prodding by agents of influence close to him).

(And you have to wonder where Trump got the idea that NATO is "obsolete" or "needs to pay up?"  I don't actually know, but this might be a start: http://www.rollingstone.com/politics/news/why-cant-our-allies-defend-themselves-19880616).


The dossier tries to make Trump sound like a witting spy for Russia:


https://archive.org/stream/TrumpIntelligenceAllegations_201701/Trump-Intelligence-Allegations_djvu.txt
	...In terms of the intelligence flow from the TRUMP team to Russia, Source E reported that much of this concerned the activities of business oligarchs and their families’ activities and assets in the US, with which PUTIN and the Kremlin seemed preoccupied. 

	...the emigre confirmed that an intelligence exchange had been running between them for at least 8 years. Within this context PUTIN'S priority requirement had been for intelligence on the activities, business and otherwise, in the US of leading Russian oligarchs and their families. TRUMP and his associates duly had obtained and supplied the Kremlin with this information.


But that's not consistent with how Russia's influence operations have worked historically (e.g with Gore, Mao: https://pastebin.com/r5PHGSnz), and Trump has all the hallmarks of a "useful idiot" who actually believes what he's saying. Russia puts out their propaganda because it works--there are people who actually believe it. It looks like Donald Trump actually believes it: 


http://www.politicususa.com/2017/06/03/nbc-news-refuses-report-trump-london-bridge-tweet-false-info.html
	Donald Trump retweeted:

		Fears of new terror attack after van 'mows down 20 people' on London Bridge…

		— DRUDGE REPORT (@DRUDGE_REPORT) June 3, 2017

	Trump then tweeted a plea for his travel ban as a tool to fight terrorism:

	We need to be smart, vigilant and tough. We need the courts to give us back our rights. We need the Travel Ban as an extra level of safety!

		— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) June 3, 2017


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/527388136306143232
	Just out - the POLAR ICE CAPS are at an all time high, the POLAR BEAR population has never been stronger. Where the hell is global warming?

	2:15 AM - 29 Oct 2014


https://www.infowars.com/penguins-polar-bears-glaciers-arctic-ice-all-thriving/
	Global warming alarmists debunked yet again by reality

	Even as climate alarmists amplify their call for a worldwide tax on carbon dioxide emissions in the name of preventing global warming – penguins, polar bears, Himalayan glaciers and Arctic sea ice are all thriving.


https://www.infowars.com/polar-bear-numbers-still-on-the-rise-despite-global-warming/
	Polar Bear Numbers Still On The Rise, Despite Global Warming


http://politicalticker.blogs.cnn.com/2014/03/28/trump-weighs-in-on-vaccine-autism-controversy/
	March 28th, 2014 

	Trump weighs in on vaccine-autism controversy

 	Donald Trump appears to be once again suggesting a link between vaccines and the rise in autism, a theory that's been debunked numerous times in recent years.

	"If I were President I would push for proper vaccinations but would not allow one time massive shots that a small child cannot take – AUTISM," the business mogul and reality TV star wrote on Twitter Thursday evening.


https://www.infowars.com/nearly-two-dozen-medical-studies-prove-that-vaccines-can-cause-autism/
	Nearly two dozen medical studies prove that vaccines can cause autism


https://www.washingtonpost.com/lifestyle/style/how-alex-jones-conspiracy-theorist-extraordinaire-got-donald-trumps-ear/2016/11/17/583dc190-ab3e-11e6-8b45-f8e493f06fcd_story.html
	Last December, amid the jumbled Republican presidential nomination scrum, Donald Trump carved out a half an hour for a live video interview with a volcanic Austin radio and web-streaming host who broadcasts from a semi-secret location dubbed “The Central Texas Command Center and the Heart of the Resistance.”

	Alex Jones, America’s foremost purveyor of outlandish conspiracy theories, was in a buoyant mood that day. He’d had Matt Drudge, the influential conservative news aggregator, on recently. But this was much bigger.

	Trump wasted no time signaling that his mind-set aligned with the host’s. Trump said he wouldn’t apologize for asserting that large numbers of Muslims in New Jersey celebrated the collapse of the twin towers in the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks, a claim that fact-checkers have repeatedly refuted.

	“People like you and I can’t do that so easily,” the New York developer, speaking from his office in Trump Tower, said. He would later call Jones “a nice guy.”

	The December interview would reverberate into the general election as Hillary Clinton tried to use it to paint Trump as an irresponsible crackpot associating with an irresponsible crackpot. It also pushed Jones, who operates the websites Infowars.com and Prisonplanet.com, from the realm of niche showman into the mainstream national dialogue. The man who said that the Newtown, Conn., school shooting was a “hoax” involving child actors and claimed that elements of the U.S. government were responsible for bombing the Oklahoma City federal building and for the 9/11 attacks had been granted an enormous new audience.

	“I think Alex Jones may be the single most important voice in the alternative conservative media,” says Roger Stone, the Nixon-era political trickster who orchestrated Trump’s appearance on the show.

	...Now, another Anderson company, Genesis Communications Network, syndicates the Alex Jones program to 129 radio stations, many of them in small markets. It’s difficult to confirm Jones’s audience size, but the host has said he has 5 million daily radio listeners and recently topped 80 million video views in a single month. He claims to have a bigger audience than Rush Limbaugh.

	Jones is able to multiply his audience by simulcasting his radio programming via his website and further spreading its reach on his YouTube channel. The costs are minuscule in comparison to running, say, a cable television network, and it’s conceivable he could be generating millions in profits. 


The Russians wouldn't need to blackmail or pay Trump for him to revere Putin or support disastrous policies that favor them--that's already in their propaganda, and he believes it. Basically, they've already got his mind.


There's a lot that's off with the dossier:


https://archive.org/stream/TrumpIntelligenceAllegations_201701/Trump-Intelligence-Allegations_djvu.txt
	So far TRUMP has declined various sweetener real estate business deals offered him in Russia in order to further the Kremlin’s cultivation of him.

	...The Kremlin’s cultivation operation on TRUMP also comprised offering him various lucrative real estate development business deals in Russia, especially in relation to the ongoing Cup soccer tournament However, so far, for reasons unknown, TRUMP had not taken up any of these

	However, there were other aspects to TRUMP’s engagement with the Russian authorities. One which had borne fruit for them was to exploit TRUMP'S personal obsessions and sexual perversion

	...Finally, regarding TRUMP’s claimed minimal investment profile in Russia, a separate source with direct knowledge said this had not been for want of trying. TRUMP's previous efforts had included exploring the real estate sector in St Petersburg as well as Moscow but in the end TRUMP had had to settle for the use of extensive sexual services there from local prostitutes rather than business success. 


The dossier downplays Trump's business connections with Russia, saying Trump "opted for extensive sexual services" instead (how does that even work? "Sorry, we won't let you build a hotel here, but here's a complementary prostitute?"). But this is misleading--if Trump doesn't make "business deals" in Russia, he does make deals with Russians:


http://www.nydailynews.com/news/world/russian-mogul-pays-donald-trump-100-million-florida-mansion-article-1.294453
	June 21, 2008
     
	A Russian billionaire paid Donald Trump a staggering $100 million for a beachfront Florida mansion — although the new digs don’t mean the new owner’s bidding dosvidaniya to his Moscow home.
     
     Dmitry Rybolovlev, 41, who made his fortune in fertilizer, said his big-bucks buy of the 6.5-acre Maison de l’Amitie property in Palm Beach was simply an investment.


http://www.eturbonews.com/5008/executive-talk-donald-trump-jr-bullish-russia-and-few-emerging-ma
	Sep 15, 2008

	Executive Talk: Donald Trump Jr. bullish on Russia and few emerging markets

	“And in terms of high-end product influx into the US, Russians make up a pretty disproportionate cross-section of a lot of our assets; say in Dubai, and certainly with our project in SoHo and anywhere in New York. We see a lot of money pouring in from Russia.


"A pretty disproportionate cross-section of a lot of our assets" doesn't sound like a "minimal investment profile."


Reportedly, some of these deals show up on Trump's tax returns:


http://money.cnn.com/2017/05/12/news/trump-tax-returns-russia/index.html
	The letter also asserts that the returns show no debt owed to or interest paid to Russian lenders by Trump or his business entities.

	In addition, the returns show no Russian investments in Trump's businesses or any investment by Trump or the entities he controls in Russian businesses, the lawyers said.

	But the letter acknowledges that there are three exceptions. The first was income Trump received from the 2013 Miss Universe pageant held in Moscow. The second was income from the sale of a Florida estate in 2008 by Trump Properties LLC to a Russian billionaire. And the third is the "ordinary course sales of goods and services to Russians or Russian entities, such as sales/rentals/fees for condominiums, hotel rooms, rounds of golf, books or Trump-licensed products."

	But in this third exception, the letter asserted, "the amounts are immaterial." 


The dossier downplays the idea that Trump could be blackmailed for business deals with Russians, and plays-up that he could be blackmailed for perverted sexual acts. But it looks like it's the other way around (Trump asked the FBI to investigate the "Russian hookers" claim, even though he doesn't trust the intelligence community: http://www.businessinsider.com/comey-trump-russian-hookers-dossier-2017-6).


The dossier makes some confusing claims about Putin's intent:


https://archive.org/stream/TrumpIntelligenceAllegations_201701/Trump-Intelligence-Allegations_djvu.txt
	- Ex-Ukrainian President YANUKOVYCH confides directly to PUTIN that he authorised kick-back payments to MANAFORT, as alleged in western media. Assures Russian President however there is no documentary evidence/trail 

	PUTIN and Russian leadership remain worried however and sceptical that YANUKOVYCH has fully covered the traces of these payments to TRUMP’s former campaign manager 

	...Speaking in confidence to a compatriot in late July 2016, Source E, and ethnic Russian close associate of US presidential candidate Donald Trump, admitted that there was a well-developed conspiracy of co-operation between then and Russian leadership. This was managed on the TRUMP side by the Republican candidate's campaign manager, Paul MANAFORT, who was using foreign policy advisor, Carter PAGE, and others as intermediaries. The two sides had a mutual interest in defeating Democratic presidential candidate Hillary CLINTON, whom President PUTIN apparently both hated and feared.

	...We reported previously, in our Company Intelligence Report 2016/135 of 19 October 2016 from the same source, that COHEN met officials from the PA Legal Department clandestinely in an EU country in August 2016. This was in order to clean up the mess left behind by western media  revelations of TRUMP ex-campaign manager MANAFORT's corrupt relationship with the former pro-Russian YANUKOVYCH regime in Ukraine and TRUMP foreign policy advisor, Carter PAGE'S secret meetings in Moscow with senior regime figures in July 2016. According to the Kremlin advisor, these meeting/ s were originally scheduled for COHEN in Moscow but shifted to what was considered an operationally "soft" EU country when it was judged too compromising for him to travel to the Russian capital. 

	...

	1. Speaking in late August 2016, in the immediate aftermath of Paul MANAFORT’s resignation as campaign manager for US Republican presidential candidate Donald TRUMP, a well-placed Russian figure reported on a recent meeting between President PUTIN and ex-President YANUKOVYCH of Ukraine. This had been held in secret on 15 August near Volgograd, Russia and the western media revelations about MANAFORT and Ukraine had featured prominently on the agenda. YANUKOVYCH had confided in PUTIN that he did authorise and order substantial kick-back payments to MANAFORT as alleged but sought to reassure him that there was no documentary trail left behind which could provide clear evidence of this. 

	2. Given YANUKOVYCH'S (unimpressive) record in covering up his own corrupt tracks in the past, PUTIN and others in the Russian leadership were sceptical about the ex-Ukrainian president’s reassurances on this as relating to MANAFORT. They therefore still feared the scandal had legs, especially as MANAFORT had been commercially active in Ukraine right up to the time (in March 2016) when he joined TRUMP's campaign team. For them it therefore remained a point of potential political vulnerability and embarrassment. 


The dossier says Putin choose Manafort and Page to help him secretly collude with Trump, and that Putin was worried when news reports revealed Yankovych was paying Manafort under-the-table (e.g. https://www.nytimes.com/2016/08/20/us/politics/paul-manafort-resigns-donald-trump.html). But it was revealed years ago that Manafort was working for Yanukovych:


http://www.politico.com/story/2014/03/paul-manafort-ukraine-104263
	Mystery man: Ukraine's U.S. fixer

	By Alexander Burns and Maggie Haberman

	03/05/2014 05:01 AM EST 

	...Today, Paul Manafort is more like The Invisible Man — a worldly political pro whose latest adventure, whispering in the ear of Ukrainian presidential candidate Viktor Yanukovych, has handed him a supporting role in a bona fide international crisis. 

	...Manafort’s firm had a set of international clients and produced an analysis of the Orange Revolution that Yanukovych found instructive, according to one operative involved in Yanukovych’s political rehabilitation. Manafort became, in effect, a general consultant to Yanukovych’s Party of Regions, shaping big-picture messaging, coaching Yanukovych to speak in punchy, American-style sound bites and managing teams of consultants and attorneys in both Ukraine and the United States ahead of an anticipated Yanukovych comeback. While it’s difficult to track payments in foreign elections, a former associate familiar with Manafort’s earnings say they ran into the seven figures over several years.

	...A 2008 disclosure form filed by Edelman under the Foreign Agents Registration Act described the Yanukovych team’s determination to “share [Yanukovych’s] vision for Ukraine, his reform slated for 2008, his accomplishments in economic development as well as Ukraine’s business development.” The PR firm earned $35,000 a month for its services. 

	...And one operative closely involved in Ukraine emphasized that what may have started as a straightforward business transaction between Davis Manafort and Yanukovych grew into a “real and close relationship” between Manafort and his candidate over the course of the election. 


And Putin has openly admitted to colluding with him:


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-europe-29761799
	Putin: Russia helped Yanukovych to flee Ukraine

	..."I will say it openly - he asked to be driven away to Russia, which we did," the Russian president said.


And if Putin wanted to avoid being tied to the Trump campaign, he would have known Page would be a bad choice of "intermediary":


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/04/us/politics/carter-page-trump-russia.html?mcubz=1
	The businessman, Carter Page, met with one of three Russians who were eventually charged with being undeclared officers with Russia’s foreign intelligence service, known as the S.V.R. The F.B.I. interviewed Mr. Page in 2013 as part of an investigation into the spy ring, but decided that he had not known the man was a spy, and the bureau never accused Mr. Page of wrongdoing.

	...According to the court documents filed in 2015, the F.B.I. secretly recorded Mr. Podobnyy and another Russian operative named Igor Sporyshev discussing efforts to recruit Mr. Page, who was then working in New York as a consultant.


But according to the dossier, Putin thinks the recent scandals surrounding Manafort's ties to Yanukovych are a point of "political vulnerability" and "embarrassment" for him, and that Putin is "worried." Worried about what? The only difference between the 2014 and 2016 reports on Manafort's ties to Yanukovych is that the 2016 reports allege under-the-table payments. Is that what Putin is worried about? That Manafort looks more corrupt now?

The dossier mostly paints a picture of Putin trying to avoid being exposed in the media for his meddling in the election and his ties to Trump:


https://archive.org/stream/TrumpIntelligenceAllegations_201701/Trump-Intelligence-Allegations_djvu.txt
	...The two sides had a mutual interest in defeating Democratic presidential candidate Hillary CLINTON, whom President PUTIN apparently both hated and feared.

	...The emigre said there was a high level of anxiety within the TRUMP team as a result of various accusations levelled against them and indications from the Kremlin that President PUTIN and others in the leadership thought things had gone too far now and risked spiralling out of control. 

	Continuing on this theme, the emigre associate of TRUMP opined that the Kremlin wanted the situation to calm but for 'plausible deniability' to be maintained concerning its (extensive) pro-TRUMP and anti-CLINTON operations. S/he therefore judged that it was unlikely these would be ratcheted up, at least for the time being. 

	...the ethnic Russian associate of Trump assessed that the problem was that the TRUMP campaign had underestimated the strength of the negative reaction from liberals and especially the conservative elite to Russian interference. This was forcing a rethink and a likely change of tactics. The main objective in the short term was to check Democratic candidate Hillary CLINTON's successful exploitation of the PUTIN as a bogeyman/Russian interference story to tarnish TRUMP and bolster her own (patriotic) credentials.

	...1. Speaking in confidence to a trusted compatriot in mid-September 2016, a senior member of the Russian Presidential Administration (PA) commented on the political fallout from recent western media revelations about Moscow's intervention, in favour of Donald TRUMP and against Hillary CLINTON, in the US presidential election. The PA official reported that the issue had become incredibly sensitive and that President PUTIN had issued direct orders that Kremlin and government insiders should not discuss it in public or even in private. 

	2. Despite this, the PA official confirmed, from direct knowledge, that the gist of the allegations was true. PUTIN had been receiving conflicting advice on interfering from three separate and expert groups. On one side had been the Russian ambassador to the US, Sergei K1SLYAK, and the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, together with an independent and informal network run by presidential foreign policy advisor, Yuri USHAKOV 

	(KISLYAK’s predecessor in Washington) who had urged caution and the potential negative impact on Russia from the operation/s. On the other side was former PA Head, Sergei IVANOV, backed by Russian Foreign Intelligence (SVR), who had advised PUTIN that the pro-TRUMP, anti-CLINTON operation/s would be both effective and plausibly deniable with little blowback. The first group/s had been proven right and this had been the catalyst in PUTIN'S decision to sack IVANOV (unexpectedly) as PA Head in August. His successor, Anton VAINO, had been selected for the job partly because he had not been involved in the US presidential election operation/s. 

	..According to the Kremlin insider, COHEN now was heavily engaged in a cover up and damage limitation operation in the attempt to prevent the full details of TRUMP’s relationship with Russia being exposed. In pursuit of this aim, COHEN had met secretly with several Russian Presidential Administration (PA) Legal Department officials in an EU country in August 2016. The immediate issues had been to contain further scandals involving MANNAFORT's commercial and political role in Russia/Ukraine and to limit the damage arising from exposure of former TRUMP foreign policy advisor, Carter PAGE’S secret meetings with Russian leadership figures in Moscow the previous month. The overall objective had been to “to sweep it all under the carpet and make sure no connections could be fully established or proven" 


But it looks like a lot of the exposés on Putin's meddling come from his own spies (including the "Putin hates and fears Hillary" narrative), particularly those targeting the left:

(context for Russian spies: https://pastebin.com/ar4GWrRT, https://pastebin.com/z49g6KKe, https://pastebin.com/r5PHGSnz, https://pastebin.com/bqyWNzgi)


http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2016/12/russia-putin-hack-dnc-clinton-election-2016-cold-war-214532
	Putin’s Revenge

	By Michael Crowley 

	...Today, as the U.S. grapples with a Russia with resurgent global ambitions, with a Kremlin that hacks our emails, manipulates our news—and, according to the CIA, actively worked to elect Donald Trump—it’s important to realize that for Putin, it’s not just a constant move for advantage. Yes, Putin is pressing Russia’s current interests. But in scheming to defeat Hillary Clinton, and by subjecting American democracy itself to Russian influence, he is also closing a loop opened in part by the Clintons 20 years ago. Putin can’t undo Russia’s Cold War defeat by America. But he can avenge it. And in Donald Trump—the man who defeated Hillary Clinton and seems ready to deal with Putin on terms that few other American politicians would countenance—he hopes he has found a willing partner.

	...But it wasn’t until December 2011 that Putin came to see Hillary Clinton as a direct threat to his power. 

	...In a March 2014 address shortly after claiming Crimea, Putin made clear that he was re-establishing Russia’s place in the global order. He said the world had to “accept the obvious fact: Russia is an independent, active participant in international affairs. Like other countries, it has its own national interests that need to be taken into account and respected.” Translation: Russia would no longer be seated at the kids’ table while Washington dictated world events.

	Increasingly, it has become clear that another foreign nation where Russia has exercised its new influence is the United States itself, where Hillary Clinton’s campaign was beset for months by a steady flow of stolen emails—hacked, according to U.S. intelligence officials, by agents of the Kremlin, likely at Putin’s personal direction.

	It’s impossible to measure the precise effect of the leaked emails on Clinton’s candidacy. But her defeat was unquestionably a win for Putin, who will soon greet an American president leading what could be the most Russia-friendly administration in U.S. history. Putin sent Donald Trump his congratulations within an hour of Clinton’s concession. And when word of Trump’s election reached the Russian Duma, spontaneous applause broke out in the room. 

http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/16/mcmaster-truth-defense-secrets-238470
	 McMaster tests truth-telling reputation in Trump defense
	H.R. McMaster's strong defense of Trump on Russia leak brings credibility — and sharp criticism.
	By Michael Crowley  May 16


https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2016/11/dont-gamble-on-trump/506207/
	The Conservative Case for Voting for Clinton

	Why support a candidate who rejects your preferences and offends your opinions? Don’t do it for her—do it for the republic, and the Constitution.

	David Frum

https://twitter.com/davidfrum/status/864440403117969408?lang=en
	How does McMaster not resign today? That thing he said "did not happen" the president has just defended doing


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/08/neera-tanden-2016-election-227494
	 Meet Hillary Clinton's anger translator

	In an interview for POLITICO's 'Off Message' podcast, longtime Clinton confidante Neera Tanden sounds off on Bernie Sanders' attacks, the 2016 election coverage and Vladimir Putin.

	By Glenn Thrush 

	...“I think Putin is definitely not a fan of Hillary Clinton's, I mean, look at his own rhetoric,” she told me. “Hillary was very clear in her condemnation of his actions toward democracy protesters. She was very strong and he took that as a very strong affront.”

	Tanden, like many other Clinton advisers, won’t go so far as to allege collusion between Putin and top officials Trump’s campaign — especially former campaign chairman Paul Manafort, who was a high-paid consultant for Putin allies in Ukraine. But she thinks the U.S. body politic is experiencing a foreign invasion unprecedented in history by a Russian interloper she describes as a “proto-fascist” strongman.

http://www.politico.com/story/2015/10/joe-biden-2016-thrush-off-message-215031
	 5 takeaways from Biden's not-quite-campaign

	In the words of a longtime ally, it became increasingly clear that the planning was more “fantasy football than football.”

	By Glenn Thrush 

	There was so, so much going for a Joe Biden presidential campaign — wasn’t there? His shaggy-dog “authenticity,” the tantalizing possibility of a Hillary Clinton face plant, the endless egging-on by a D.C. press corps that coveted a Joe-vs.-Hillary fight over a dreary, substance-y battle between Clinton and a Larry David doppelgänger.

	The solitary item in the “no” column: reality.

	Joe Biden was a bad presidential candidate in 1988 and 2008, and he didn’t seem to be brandishing many new skills (especially discipline or a measured tongue) in his more than four decades of public life.

	At 72, with his 46-year-old son, Beau (whom he viewed as the most likely president in the Biden family), buried less than six months ago, the vice president’s restless mind alighted on an unexpected path to a political future — until his gaze returned to reality and legacy. In the end, he opted to stop where he stood — as an uncommonly powerful and collaborative vice president.

	...It was never going to happen.

	...Biden, my sources in his orbit have repeatedly told me, believed his greatest legacy would have been Beau’s election to the presidency — not his own — and he cherished the idea that the shattered boy rescued from the car wreck that killed his wife and baby daughter would someday occupy the Oval Office. With that dream gone, he picked up the flag himself and began to believe the overly optimistic reports that his dedicated inner circle — especially the exhortations of his surviving son, Hunte,r and longtime adviser Mike Donilon — were feeding him.


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/07/clinton-putin-226153
	 Why Putin hates Hillary

	Behind the allegations of a Russian hack of the DNC is the Kremlin leader's fury at Clinton for challenging the fairness of Russian elections.

	By Michael Crowley and Julia Ioffe 

http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2016/10/seven-reasons-the-new-russian-hack-announcement-is-a-big-deal-214330
	 Seven Reasons the New Russian Hack Announcement Is a Big Deal
	It might turn out to be bigger than the Trump tape. A Moscow-watcher explains what's really going on.
	By Julia Ioffe 

	...This marks a new sophistication in Russia’s understanding of American politics. The Russians didn’t always know what the DNC was—or at least why it was worth hacking. The fact that it now does represents a massive leap forward for Russian intelligence.

	Just a few years ago, the Russians wouldn’t have known about the intricacies of American domestic politics.


Why they would do this is anyone's guess. One possibility is that they want to spread misinformation about Russia's activities so that they can discredit the idea of Russian meddling later. Another is that they want to politicize the issue, which would make it harder for many Americans to reason or learn about Russia's activities and motives. Politicizing important issues looks like a tactic for the Russians:


https://archive.org/stream/BezmenovLoveLetterToAmerica/YuriBezmenov-LoveLetterToAmerica_djvu.txt
	After several months I was formally recruited by the KGB as an informer, while still maintaining my position as a Novosti journalist. My work with the KGB entailed combining my journalistic duties with the collection of intelligence data, and the spreading of "disinformation" to foreign countries for the purposes of Soviet propaganda and subversion.

	...All the subverter has to do to remove the spiritual backbone of America is to help you to POLITICIZE, COMMERCIALIZE and 'ENTERTAINMENT-ALIZE' the dominant religions.

	...Politicizing religion is the most efficient method of demoralizing a target nation. Once a nation starts giving to Caesar what belongs to God, and getting God involved in such things as 'social justice' and partisan political squabbles, it predictably loses what religion calls mercy and the grace of God. To put it in 'atheistic' terms, a target country allows the subverter to use the area of moral values for dissemination and enforcement of amoral ideas and policies. The most powerful instrument of this process is an organization called World Council of Churches, infiltrated by the KGB to such extent, that it is hard to distinguish, these days, a priest from a spy. Being a public relations officer for Novosti, I accompanied many foreign members of the WCC during their visits to the USSR. Some of them struck me as individuals pathologically unable to say or hear truth. They were simply allergic to any facts or opinions which would 'undermine' their 'spiritual' affiliation with the Soviet manipulators.


http://www.catholicnewsagency.com/news/former-soviet-spy-we-created-liberation-theology-83634/
	Former Soviet spy: We created Liberation Theology

	...In general, could you say that the spreading of Liberation Theology had any kind of Soviet connection?

	Yes. I learned the fine points of the KGB involvement with Liberation Theology from Soviet General Aleksandr Sakharovsky, communist Romania's chief razvedka (foreign intelligence) adviser – and my de facto boss, until 1956, when he became head of the Soviet espionage service, the PGU1,  a position he held for an unprecedented record of 15 years.

	...Was the Theology of Liberation a movement somehow "created" by Sakharovsky's part of the KGB, or it was an existing movement that was exacerbated by the USSR?

	The movement was born in the KGB, and it had a KGB-invented name: Liberation Theology. During those years, the KGB had a penchant for “liberation” movements. The National Liberation Army of Columbia (FARC), created by the KGB with help from Fidel Castro; the “National Liberation Army of Bolivia, created by the KGB with help from “Che” Guevara; and the Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO), created by the KGB with help from Yasser Arafat are just a few additional “liberation” movements born at the Lubyanka -- the headquarters of the KGB.

	The birth of Liberation Theology was the intent of a 1960 super-secret “Party-State Dezinformatsiya Program” approved by Aleksandr Shelepin, the chairman of the KGB, and by Politburo member Aleksey Kirichenko, who coordinated the Communist Party's international policies. This program demanded that the KGB take secret control of the World Council of Churches (WCC), based in Geneva, Switzerland, and use it as cover for converting Liberation Theology into a South American revolutionary tool. The WCC was the largest international ecumenical organization after the Vatican, representing some 550 million Christians of various denominations throughout 120 countries.

	The birth of a new religious movement is a historic event. How was this new religious movement launched?

	The KGB began by building an intermediate international religious organization called the Christian Peace Conference (CPC), which was headquartered in Prague. Its main task was to bring the KGB-created Liberation Theology into the real world.

	The new Christian Peace Conference was managed by the KGB and was subordinated to the venerable World Peace Council, another KGB creation, founded in 1949 and by then also headquartered in Prague.

	During my years at the top of the Soviet bloc intelligence community I managed the Romanian operations of the World Peace Council (WPC). It was as purely KGB as it gets. Most of the WPC’s employees were undercover Soviet bloc intelligence officers.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Talk:Harry_Hopkins
	Talk:Harry Hopkins

	Someone has vandalized this page.

	"Such critiques of Roosevelt and Hopkins as the notorious book, Verona Secrets, paint Hopkins as a Russian spy. No such allegation has been substantiated or proven." http://www.u-s-history.com/pages/h1610.html. It's pretty sad really.

 	...What is sad is your reliance on stale history and offer of only opinion. Information is actually coming from the Soviet archives that Hopkins was in fact considered an "agent of influence" for the Soviets inside the U.S. Do you speak Russian?

	...Vasily Mitrokhin was a KGB archivist who defected from the Soviet Union with copies of KGB files. He claimed Harry Hopkins was a secret Russian agent.

	...Does the above writer know Russian? Obviously he is not concerned with the basic facts of history and has no evidence whatsover to back up his claims. No, the above is scurrilous demogoguery emanating historically from Hopkins' and FDR's political opponents among the America First crowd and others who were unenthusiastic about World War 2 and loathed the New Deal as "socialism". The Soviet Union was our ally in the biggest, most cataclysmic war in human history. In his capacity as FDR's chief foreign affairs advisor and emissary he worked to solidify and manage these alliances playing a role in facilitating military aid to these countries, not only Russia but...


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Harry_Hopkins#Relations_with_the_Soviet_Union
	...Hopkins continued to be a target of Republican attacks even after his death. George Racey Jordan testified to the House Un-American Activities Committee in December 1949 that Hopkins passed nuclear secrets to the USSR. While Democrats dismissed Jordan’s testimony, Republicans championed it. ...Roll further notes that in 1963 the FBI concluded that Jordan's allegations could not be substantiated, adding that Jordan "either lied for publicity and profit or was delusional."


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2001/jan/4/20010104-020500-7670r/
	Harry Hopkins, Soviet agent

	...But the liberals, dreading the charge that they had ignored the peril, counterattacked, turning Wisconsin Sen. Joseph McCarthy into an all-purpose villain who allegedly smeared innocent victims with groundless charges of communism or pro-communism, and gradually the tide turned. 


https://pastebin.com/r5PHGSnz


http://www.newyorker.com/magazine/2000/07/31/gore-without-a-script
	Gore asked a group of his friends to set up a series of seminars for him, like the arms-control seminars with Leon Fuerth, only much more ambitious, with big-time thinkers, such as the economists Kenneth Arrow and Brian Arthur, flying to Washington to brief him. Up one level! By the end of it, Gore had a new, sweeping view of the world and its prospects. His main interest had noticeably shifted, from arms control to global warming, but the setup was familiar: mankind was in a morally dire situation of its own making, which could be solved through a combination of analytic mastery, spiritual guidance, and the use of technology in healthy ways instead of unhealthy ones.


https://www.livescience.com/22069-polarization-climate-science.html
	How Climate Science Became Politicized

	...Part of the problem is that climate change has moved out of the realm of research and into the political arena, Leiserowitz said. The climate-change views of the two political parties were not significantly different until the Kyoto Protocol negotiations of 1997, when policymakers began to look for solutions to global warming.

	This was in the midst of the polarizing Clinton administration, and for some, the association made global warming belief seem unsavory. Even today, many climate-change naysayers think of former vice president Al Gore when they hear the words "climate change."

	"They loathe Al Gore," Leiserowitz said. "Sometimes I joke that Al Gore could hold a press conference tomorrow to say that science has determined that the Earth is round and people out there would say, 'Well, no it isn't.'" 


https://www.infowars.com/leftist-pr-firm-pressuring-media-to-blame-climate-change-for-hurricane-joaquin/
	Leftist PR Firm Pressuring Media to Blame “Climate Change” for Hurricane Joaquin
	Liberals are exploiting a potential tragedy to promote their alarmist agenda


https://www.infowars.com/liberal-fascist-calls-for-global-warming-skeptics-to-be-arrested/
	Liberal Fascist Calls For Global Warming Skeptics to be Arrested


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Ainfowars.com+global+warming


https://pastebin.com/e4qCs1AT


https://www.cnas.org/publications/blog/5-questions-with-someone-interesting-charles-emmerson
	5 Questions with Someone Interesting: Charles Emmerson

	 CE: Well first of all, there’s certainly an increasing convergence in terms of the idea that climate change is the reality, and that a large part of it is anthropogenic, although there are still a number of Russian scientists – including at the Arctic and Antarctic Research Institute in St. Petersburg – who argue that the anthropogenic contribution is generally overstated in the West. The argument put to me there was that what we’re now seeing in the Arctic – and there’s no denying that Arctic warming is real – is a blip, and it may actually be overshadowed by a natural cooling effect over time. This argument was put to me in Russia, but it’s not current elsewhere around the Arctic. So there’s still some divergence in scientists’ views, but not very much and it’s becoming smaller.

	But in terms of *effects*, it really depends on who you talk to.


https://www.newscientist.com/blogs/shortsharpscience/2009/12/since-over-1000-confidential-e.html
	Climategate: Russian secret service blamed for hack


http://faculty.wcas.northwestern.edu/~jnd260/pub/Bolsen%20Druckman%20Cook%20PBehavior%202013.pdf
	The Influence of Partisan Motivated Reasoning on Public Opinion

	Abstract  Political parties play a vital role in democracies by linking citizens to their representatives. Nonetheless, a longstanding concern is that partisan identification slants decision-making. Citizens may support (oppose) policies  that they would otherwise oppose (support) in the absence of an endorsement from a political party—this is due in large part to what is called partisan motivated reasoning where individuals interpret information through the lens of their party commitment. We explore partisan motivated reasoning in a survey experiment focusing on support for an energy law. We identify two politically relevant factors that condition partisan motivated reasoning: (1) an explicit inducement to form an ‘‘accurate’’ opinion, and (2) cross-partisan, but not consensus, bipartisan support for the law. We further provide evidence of how partisan motivated reasoning works psychologically and affects opinion strength. We conclude by discussing the implications of our results for understanding opinion formation and the overall quality of citizens’ opinions.


(compare to:

http://www.nbcnews.com/card/nbc-news-exit-poll-honesty-vs-temperament-n680296?cid=sm_tw
	Indeed, nearly six in 10 voters interviewed in NBC Exit Polls so far today say that Clinton is not honest and trustworthy. Slightly more than one-third say she is. 


https://archive.org/details/MSNBCW_20160808_100000_Morning_Joe/start/660/end/720
	It's weird Hillary Clinton wasnts that everything was hunky dory with the e-mails and they were cleared of wrongdoing and that's their spin and nobody believes it. Nobody in America believes it.

http://www.breitbart.com/big-government/2016/09/06/russian-conspiracy-hillary-clinton-absurd-trump/
	Hillary Clinton’s Absurd, McCarthyist Russian Conspiracy Theory

http://www.breitbart.com/big-journalism/2016/09/12/clintons-russia-conspiracy-theory-salvage-election/
	Hillary Clinton’s campaign has been placing increasing emphasis on a bizarre conspiracy theory that claims Russia is hacking the U.S. election to ensure that Donald Trump wins.

http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/sean-hannity-russian-hacking-liberal-media-fake-news_us_584fdd10e4b0e05aded5b6c1
	Sean Hannity Says Russian Hacking Probe Is ‘Liberal Media Fake News Story’

http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/gop-russia-putin-support-232714
	More Republicans viewing Putin favorably

	GOP sympathies for Putin and his homeland are rising)


A lot of Russian propaganda goes towards increasing animosity between the left and right and politicizing issues of interest to them. By politicizing the issue of their meddling, Russia can make it harder for politically-inclined Americans to reason about their activities (another benefit: cover for spies, who can claim to be motivated by the politics of the day rather than loyalty to a foreign power). Tying the warnings of Russian meddling to the words of Clinton, a polarizing figure, would help with this (to get a sense of one of the ways Clinton inadvertently helped Putin, read this http://www.politico.com/story/2016/07/trump-putin-no-relationship-226282 and imagine Trump was asking Russia to attack Biden instead. Clinton helped Russia manipulate Republicans with the idea that "the enemy of my enemy is my friend.")

If they intended this, it looks like it worked: you can see more than a few politicians and pundits on the right arguing that Russian interference is ineffective and overstated (or doesn't exist), and plenty on the left jumping on every meeting with a Russian official, kind word towards Trump, or dubious Russia-related report as evidence of treachery:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/03/20/full-transcript-fbi-director-james-comey-testifies-on-russian-interference-in-2016-election/
	STEWART: That's exactly right and are both of your agencies capable of handling accusations agree with me on that. I'd like to shift quickly if I could to the integrity of the report which the previous DNI when he determined along with your acquiescence, I might add, both of you, that Russia developed a clear preference for Mr. Trump and this is a huge deal. I mean, think about this story the American people have been told and some believe that our president was elected maybe because of the influence of a foreign government.

	And I love you guys, you know that, and I defend you and we respect what you do but I do need to make this point and that is the intelligence community is not perfect, is it?

	COMEY: Not perfect?

	STEWART: Yes.

	COMEY: Certainly not.

	STEWART: Certainly not. We...

	...STEWART: And as has been indicated here, and look again, that's not a criticism, it's just the human endeavor. We sometimes make mistakes as do agencies sometimes make mistakes and all of us can think of examples of that including meaningful mistakes, by the way. Mistakes that had clear implications for our policy. And as has been indicated here as well, there's a difference in the level of confidence.


http://www.spokesman.com/blogs/boise/2016/dec/08/risch-adamant-russia-didnt-affect-outcome-us-election-despite-hacking/
	Risch adamant that Russia didn’t affect outcome of U.S. election, despite hacking

	Idaho Sen. Jim Risch, a member of the Senate foreign relations and intelligence committees, was adamant on CNN yesterday that he doesn’t believe Russia successfully interfered in the U.S. election in November. “It is a fact that no one can deny that the Russians attempt to influence elections all over the world,” Risch told CNN’s Wolf Blitzer. “No one in the intelligence community has offered anything, that the Russians, whatever they did, whether it was hacking or whether it was releasing things, had any effect.”

	He added: “I don’t think they interfered. I think they attempted to interfere.”


http://www.newsmax.com/Politics/rand-paul-democrats-donald-trump-campaign/2017/05/10/id/789318/
	Rand Paul: Trump Collusion With Russia 'Huge Myth' by Democrats


http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/if-only-john-mccains-actions-matched-john-mccains-rhetoric
 	By Steve Benen

	If only John McCain’s actions matched John McCain’s rhetoric

	Sure, the GOP senator has been willing to criticize Trump – at times, in surprisingly forceful terms – which is more than can be said for many of his congressional Republican colleagues, nearly all of whom remain silent, despite genuine concerns. But McCain doesn’t just give speeches and sit down for interviews; he’s also a sitting senator who casts votes.

	And in the Senate, so far this year, McCain is voting with Trump’s position 94% of the time. As a factual matter, the senator is a Maverick in Name Only.

	...And yet, much of the political world seems inclined to credit McCain for resisting Trump’s more outlandish excesses, even though McCain isn’t following through when it counts. Worse, there are Democrats trying to get attention for the fact that they’re actually resisting Trump both rhetorically and legislatively.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/blogs/plum-line/wp/2017/06/09/the-latest-republican-defense-of-trump-is-built-on-a-massive-lie/
	The latest Republican defense of Trump is built on a massive lie
	By Greg Sargent

	Now that James B. Comey’s testimony to Congress has painted a picture of President Trump’s contempt for the rule of law that’s far more forceful and persuasive in its dramatic details than Republicans ever bargained for, the new and emerging GOP defense is that Trump is a political and procedural naif. He merely needs to learn the rules. This line of obfuscation requires pretending that many of the events of the past six months never happened.

	But this spin from Republicans has a significance that runs deeper than merely revealing the absurd lengths to which they’ll go to protect Trump from political and legal harm. More urgently, their new line unwittingly reveals the degree to which Trump’s abuses of power and assault on our democracy have depended all along upon their tacit and willful complicity — and, perhaps worse, it leaves little doubt that this enabling will continue, with unforeseen consequences.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/03/20/full-transcript-fbi-director-james-comey-testifies-on-russian-interference-in-2016-election/
	CASTRO: ...My focus today is to explore how many claims within Steele's dossier are looking more and more likely, as though they are accurate.

	...Are you investigating the claims made in the dossier?

	...The allegations it raises about President Trump's campaign aids connections to Russians, when overlaid with known established facts and timelines from the 2016 campaign are very revealing.

	...OK. Well, the dossier definitely seems right on these points.

	...A July 19, 2016 entry for example asserts that Russians were receiving intel from Trump's team on Russian oligarch

	...A July 30 entry likewise states that a source close to the Trump campaign confirms a regular exchange with the Kremlin

	...So, the dossier states in an entry dated August 10, 2016, that a quote "Kremlin official involved in U.S. relations" suggested that Moscow might offer assistance

	...Among the U.S. actors, this Kremlin official mentions a Carter Page and Michael Flynn, whom my colleagues have already discussed at length and which the dossier describes as

	...CASTRO: In an October 18, 2016, entry, the dossier states that, during Page's visit to Moscow, he met with Igor Senchin, offering, quote,"Page and Trump's associate, the brokerage of up to 19 percent stake in Rosneft," which Page conferring (ph) that, quote, "If Trump were elected U.S. President, sanctions on Russia would be lifted."

	And although fortunately the White House hasn't been so naive as to (inaudible) unilaterally lift sanctions on Russia, it was widely reported that on January 27th of this year, Rosneft sold a 19.5 percent stake in Rosneft in what Reuters calls, quote,"one of its biggest privatizations since the 1990s." Furthermore, Reuters reported that, quote, "Public records show the ownership structure of the -- of the stake ultimately includes a Cayman Islands company whose beneficial owners cannot be traced." What a coincidence.

	Is this the subject of your investigation? One of the subjects of your investigation?

	COMEY: Same answer.

	CASTRO: OK.

	COMEY: Meaning -- meaning I'm not going to comment.

	CASTRO: I understand.

	...CASTRO: OK. An entry from July 19, 2016, in the dossier states that a Trump associate knew that the Kremlin was


The dossier itself seems like a handy tool for getting the left and right to fight about Russia's activities and intentions. It reads like a Democrat partisan's dream: According to the dossier, Trump is not just a fan of Putin but a criminal collaborator, Trump is an utter pervert and the evidence is out there just waiting to be discovered, Putin dreads the Democrat's stalwart resistance, and his true motivation is fear and loathing of their champion, Hillary Clinton (at least for the partisans that support Clinton; it looks like she and Sanders have helped divide the Democratic party).

The problem is just about everything in the dossier is unverified or unverifiable, and so the people who believe it end up being the people who want to believe it.

The reality, is as far as I can tell: there is no evidence that the KGB taped Trump with prostitutes, a lot of the left (and right) helped politicize Russian interference, and Clinton was mostly just useful for installing Trump, politicizing Russian interference, and dividing the American electorate.

The dossier is also misleading in subtle but important ways. The dossier would have you believe that Russia's intelligence network aiding Trump (or "being used against CLINTON") was entirely made up of Trump himself and recruits from Russian emigres:


https://archive.org/stream/TrumpIntelligenceAllegations_201701/Trump-Intelligence-Allegations_djvu.txt
	...In terms of the FSB’s recruitment of capable cyber operatives to carry out its, ideally deniable, offensive cyber operations, a Russian IT specialist with direct knowledge reported in June 2016 that this was often done using coercion and blackmail. In terms of ‘foreign’ agents, the FSB was approaching US citizens of Russian (Jewish) origin on business trips to Russia.

	...Agreed exchange of information established in both directions. TRUMP's team using moles within DNC and hackers in the US as well as outside in Russia. PUTIN motivated by fear and hatred of Hillary CLINTON. Russians receiving intel from TRUMP’s team on Russian oligarchs and their families in US 

	Mechanism for transmitting this intelligence involves “pension" disbursements to Russian emigres living in US as cover, using consular officials in New York, DC and Miami 

	...In the wider context of TRUMP campaign/Kremlin co-operation, Source E claimed that the intelligence network being used against CLINTON comprised three elements. Firstly there were agents/facilitators within the Democratic Party structure itself; secondly Russian emigre and associated offensive cyber operators based in the US; and thirdly; state-sponsored cyber operatives working in Russia.

	...Source E claimed that Russian diplomatic staff in key cities such as New York, Washington DC and Miami were using the emigre ‘pension’ distribution system as cover. The operation therefore depended on key people in the US Russian emigre community for its success.


But deep cover spies like the SVR's illegals (https://pastebin.com/r5PHGSnz) aren't exactly what you'd call "Russian emigres," especially the ones born in the U.S. And the dossier makes it sound like the whole thing was a hacking operation (how many thousands of propagandists would Russia have to employ to write all of this: http://www.propornot.com/p/home.html ?). Anyone who based their investigation on the dossier would look for Russian agents among ethnic Russians (and Jews, apparently) who have travelled to Russia, missing agents like Vicky Pelaez (http://www.cnn.com/2010/CRIME/06/29/russian.spies.pelaez.profile/ and  https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=es&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=https%3A%2F%2Fmundo.sputniknews.com%2Ffirmas%2F201603171057745687-trump-candidato-republicanos), who emigrated from Peru. The dossier draws attention away from the fairly obvious observation that the same kind of deep cover spies arrested in 2010, who were "getting close to U.S. policymaking circles," could be used by Russia to aide Trump's campaign or to further other goals.

As for what Russia's methods and goals actually are, that's not always easy to know. The dossier says Russia aims to stop Clinton, sew division within the West, distract from Russian intervention in Ukraine, hide their meddling and collusion with Trump's team, and lift sanctions, and that the Kremlin's methods comprise hackers targeting Clinton (the word "spy" or "illegal" doesn't appear in the text) and blackmail over Trump, with the whole thing coordinated by secret meetings between Trump associates and officials based in Russia. But Russia's goals and methods are hard to figure out by design:


http://georgianreview.ge/wp-content/uploads/2015/09/bob-pdf.pdf
	Other tools, such as the uses of agents of influence, or disinformation, or maskirovka, deception to mask intent, are either Soviet or even Tsarist in their roots. The Swedish Defence Research Agency concluded that the only novelty about the Crimean annexation was that the Russians had executed it 
successfully. But this form of warfare, however one wants to call it, is ‘new’ in a few critical ways. First, most Western experts and governments did not see it coming (despite being signposted for several years) and did not know how to react when it happened. 


http://www.bbc.com/news/magazine-31020283
	 Russia's annexation of Crimea last year caught almost everyone off guard. The Russian military disguised its actions, and denied them - but those "little green men" who popped up in the Black Sea peninsula were a textbook case of the Russian practice of military deception - or maskirovka.

	At a cadet school in the southern suburbs of Moscow, Maj Gen Alexander Vladimirov heaves two enormous red volumes off his bookcase and slams them down on the table. "My Theory and Science of Warfare," he says, beaming. "It's three times longer than Leo Tolstoy's War and Peace!"

	Vladimirov, vice-president of Russia's Collegium of Military Experts, is an authority on maskirovka - the hallmark of Russian warfare and a word which translates as "something masked".
a 
	"As soon as man was born, he began to fight," he says. "When he began hunting, he had to paint himself different colours to avoid being eaten by a tiger. From that point on maskirovka was a part of his life. All human history can be portrayed as the history of deception." 

	Vladimirov quotes liberally from the Roman general Frontinus and the ancient Chinese philosopher Sun Tzu who described war as an eternal path of cunning.

	But it's Russia, he tells me, with unmistakable pride, that has over the centuries really honed these techniques to perfection.

	...Five weeks later, once the annexation had been rubber-stamped by the Parliament in Moscow, Putin admitted Russian troops had been deployed in Crimea after all. But the lie had served its purpose. Maskirovka is used to wrong-foot your enemies, to keep them guessing.

	..."I think that there is an alignment between what probably started out as military doctrine, but now is much more a part of state policy and there's an alignment between the strategic down to the tactical level in terms of the mindset of maskirovka." 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Russian_military_deception
	The 1978 Soviet Military Encyclopedia defines deception similarly, placing additional stress on strategic levels, and explicitly including political, economic and diplomatic measures besides the military ones. It largely repeats the 1944 Encyclopedia's concept, but adds that

	Strategic maskirovka is carried out at national and theater levels to mislead the enemy as to political and military capabilities, intentions and timing of actions. In these spheres, as war is but an extension of politics, it includes political, economic and diplomatic measures as well as military.


The dossier has all the hallmarks of "maskirovka." It gives the impression of a sloppy, thrown-together hacking operation carried out by whoever the FSB was able to recruit on Russian soil. But Russia's recruitment and influence network is the largest and the best in the world:


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP91-00901R000600210056-1.pdf
	Soviets embark on new path of anti-American

	14 April 1981

	Last year Central Intelligence Agency Deputy Director for Operations John McMahon testified before Congress in closed committee session that the Soviets were spending from $3 billion to $4 billion a year on anti-U.S. covert action and propaganda.

	"The Soviets have established a worldwide network of agents, organizations, and technical facilities" to implement these programs, McMahon told the House Intelligence Committee.

	That network is second to none in comparison to the major world powers in its size and effectiveness."

	According to McMahon and other sources, such covert "active measures," as distinguished from the normal intelligence collection and counterintelligence functions of the KGB, have included:

	--Written and oral "disinformation." In may 1978, Soviet Ambassador to Zambia Solodovnikov warned Zambian President Kuanda falsely that Soviet intelligence had learned British and American intelligence services were plotting to overthrow him. Kuanda was advised against making a trip to Britain and the U.S., since his departure was to precipitate the coup.

	Solodovnikov said falsely that the U.S. and Britain had used a similar plan to overthrow Nkrumah of Ghana.

	--Forgeries and false rumors. A bogus U.S. Army field manual was cited by the Soviets as proof that the CIA was secretly manipulating the terrorist Red Brigades who murdered Italian leader Aldo Moro.

	This happened after it was reported that the REd Brigades had received training in Czechoslovakia and had ties with the Soviet Union.

	"Whenever the KGB is caught red-handed in an outrageous action that threatens the Soviet Union with serious embarrassment," wrote Reader's Digest Senior Editor John Barron in his book KGB: the Secret work of Soviet Secret Agents, "it hurriedly commences disinformation operations to divert world attention from the event. Frequently the KGB simply accuses others of doing precisely what it has been shown to have done."

	The forged field manual used in the Moro case also was used by the Soviets to try to prove that U.S. military and intelligence liaisons abroad are used as cover to penetrate and manipulate friendly foreign governments.

	--"Gray" or unattributed propaganda. When the Soviets want to create an aura of authenticity around an otherwise implausible position, they use a system of press placements through non-Soviet journalists recruited to make sure Soviet articles surface in the local foreign press.


And it doesn't look like that's changed. All those spies aren't going to just pack up and leave after the fall of the Berlin wall:


http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2017/03/cia-art-spying-espionage-spies-military-terrorism-214875
	But here’s the unfortunate irony of that transformation: Our Cold War adversaries hadn’t actually gone away. While American attention was turned elsewhere, Russia had quietly continued applying its formidable knowledge of traditional spy tradecraft.
Spy_spots_final-01-redder.jpg

	Using old propaganda techniques, and its usual modus operandi of dangling potentially compromising material on subjects of interest, Russia has spent the past several years slowly rebuilding its great empire and quietly undermining the foundations of Western democracy.

	...It is clear now that, while we were fighting the war on terror, Russia was not twiddling its thumbs. Its security services are good—frighteningly good—and extremely patient. 


https://www.fbi.gov/file-repository/higher-education-national-security.pdf
	This white paper was prepared by the FBI's Counterintelligence Strategic Partnership Unit to provide awareness to administrators, senior researchers, export control offices, and technology transfer offices at higher education institutions about how foreign intelligence services and non-state actors use US colleges and universities to further their intelligence and operational needs.

	...In 2009, Russia sent the following instructions to one of its spies, Lidiya Gurveva (using the name Cynthia Murphy), while she was pursuing an MBA degree at Columbia Business School, Columbia University:

	[S]trengthen...ties w. classmates on daily basis incl. professors who can help in job search and who will have (or already have) access to secret info... [r]eport to C[enter] on their detailed personal data and character traits w. preliminary conclusions about their potential (vulnerability) to be recruited by Service.

	They also directed her to “ ‘dig up’ personal data of those students who apply (or are hired already) for a job at CIA.” Guryeva was arrested in June 2010 for acting as an agent of a foreign power and was deported back to Russia.

	This example demonstrates a foreign intelligence service searching for students who may soon have access to targeted information. Intelligence services also collect information on the programs, officers, professors, and demographics of US universities. After studying the information and, if they find a person to target, they will study his/her motivations, weaknesses, politics, and ambitions. Familiarizing themselves with a professor’s work will help them determine a pretext for contacting the professor and how best to influence or recruit the professor.


Most (or all http://www.vanityfair.com/news/2017/03/how-the-explosive-russian-dossier-was-compiled-christopher-steele) of Steele's sources are Russians. But an intelligence source doesn't always have to tell the truth--even the CIA gets fooled:


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/cia-fooled-by-massive-cold-war-double-agent-failure/
	The CIA was fooled by scores of double agents pretending to be working for the agency but secretly loyal to communist spy agencies during the Cold War and beyond, according to a former CIA analyst, operations officer, and historian.

	The large-scale deception included nearly 100 fake CIA recruits in East Germany, Cuba, as well as the Soviet Union (and later Russia) who supplied false intelligence that was passed on to senior U.S. policymakers for decades.

	"During the Cold War, the Central Intelligence Agency bucked the law of averages by recruiting double agents on an industrial scale; it was hoodwinked not a few but many times," writes Benjamin B. Fischer, CIA’s former chief historian.

	"The result was a massive but largely ignored intelligence failure," he stated in a journal article published last week.

	The failure to recognize the double agents and their disinformation designed to influence U.S. policies "wreaked havoc" on the agency, Fischer wrote in the International Journal of Intelligence and Counterintelligence.

	Fischer stated that the failure to prevent the double agent deception was dismissed by the CIA as insignificant, and that congressional oversight committees also did not press the agency to reform its vetting processes.


And Steele didn't mention how he vetted his sources--he just compiled what they said and sent it to his clients. He basically acted as a conduit from his sources to his clients, and now the world. But we know some of his sources were either lying or very misinformed, making the document, essentially, a well-crafted forgery:


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/12/parliaments-intelligence-watchdog-to-scrutinise-trump-dossier
	Paddy Ashdown, the Lib Dem peer and former diplomat, said he thought the intelligence agencies would now be trying to get to the bottom of the veracity of the allegations but the dossier showed the hallmarks of the FSB [the modern-day KGB] planting false or heavily embellished information.

	“In this hall of mirrors, anybody can indulge their wildest fantasy theory but you have to ask yourself who benefits. Clearly the CIA doesn’t. Clearly Mr Trump doesn’t. But every aspect benefits Russia,” he said.

	“It absolutely leaves Britain in a difficult position and Moscow will make the most of that. But it doesn’t mean to say we can do anything about it.”


Forging documents to confuse about their operations and intent wouldn't be new to Russian intelligence:


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP84B00049R000902220014-7.pdf
	The Soviet Forgery War

	It sounds like a John Le Carre spy thriller. Soviet agents forge some official-looking U.S. documents and try to stir up anti-American sentiment in Europe. There are letters from President Regan, former secretary of State Haig and other high-ranking officials. There are suggestions about a military coup in Greece to overthrow Socialist Premier Papandreou, a secret agreement for a U.S. intelligence base in Sweden, a letter to King Juan Carlos of Spain about ways of countering opposition to joining NATO and efforts to neutralize the anti-nuclear movement in Europe.

	Although it may sound like spy fiction, it's all too real. These are actual forgeries by the Soviet Union, which were uncovered by U.S. and allied intelligence and released to the press last week by the administration. The forgeries are only the latest in a long line of Soviet propaganda and covert action measures against the U.S.

	...The Soviet Union's propaganda war has manifold aims: to influence world public opinion against U.S. policies; to portray the U.S. as an aggressive and "imperialist" power; to discredit those foreign governments and officials who cooperate with the U.S.; to obfuscate the true nature of Soviet actions and intentions, and to create a favorable environment for the execution of Soviet foreign and military policies.


Neither would leaking them to the press:


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP90-00965R000706950001-7.pdf
	Forgery is a favorite Soviet weapon in the Cold War but has never been an important part of the U.S. disinformation arsenal.

	...Anonymous mailings. The KGB usually sends its "leaks" to the news media in plain brown wrappers with no return address, making it difficult to verify the document's authenticity. That often works with gullible or anti-American publications.

	Realizing that the communist press has little credibility, the KGB tries to plant its forgeries in noncommunist publications. Even a tiny item will do: it can then be picked up and amplified as "a well-known fact" by the pro-Soviet press. After sufficient repetition, it is broadcast by the Soviet propaganda network, usually with the standard introduction, "As the whole world knows..."


And some of their forgeries have been very good:


http://iancpilarczyk.com/10-historical-documents-proven-to-be-fake/
	During World War II, the Tanaka Memorial was portrayed by the United States as a Japanese analog to Hitler’s Mein Kampf. Even though the authenticity of the document has been widely discredited by modern scholars, the Tanaka Memorial was generally considered to be authentic in the 1930s-1940s, largely because Japan’s actions corresponded so closely to plans outlined in the document: the 1931 Mukden Incident, the Second Sino-Japanese War in 1937, The Battles of Khalkhin Gol in 1939, the Japanese invasion of French Indochina in 1940, and the attack on Pearl Harbor in 1941 and the subsequent war in the Pacific all seemed to provide corroborating evidence of its authenticity. In the modern era, many scholars believe the document to be a Soviet forgery meant to encourage war between China and Japan, while at the same time advancing Soviet interests.


https://books.google.com/books/about/The_Sword_and_the_Shield.html?id=9TWUAQ7Xof8C
	On the publication of the Tanaka memorandum, see Klehr, Haynes and Firsov, The Secret World of American Communism, pp. 52-3. The published version of the memorandum has been regarded by some scholars, unaware of the OGPU’s success at this period in intercepting Japanese communications in Harbin and Seoul, as a forgery fabricated by the OGPU. The KGB record of its interception, however, describes it as genuine. I t is possible, though Mitrokhin discovered no evidence of this, that the published version was doctored to improve its propaganda value.


Compare some of the events outlined in the Tanaka Memorial (like the Mukden incident) to the excerpts here: https://pastebin.com/e4qCs1AT The takeaway is: if Russian intelligence wants a forgery to appear credible, they can try to make its claims come true.

Beyond confusing about their methods and goals, Russian intelligence likes to use forgeries to sew doubt and chaos:


http://www.fpri.org/article/2016/09/distinguishing-true-false-fakes-forgeries-russias-information-war-ukraine/
	A highly effective disruption method is to use genuine text or documents to mask false text or documents. The objective of interspersing false text or documents within genuine text or document batches is to make the adulterated appear credible.

		[T]he USSR is not engaged constantly in an active, positive deception program designed totally to mislead us as to its intentions and objectives. To do so would be counterproductive to its own interests, and moreover would undermine the effectiveness of a positive deception program when it would be important that we accept it. A prerequisite for effective deception is to establish some degree of credibility.[28] [Emphasis added]

	Another variation is to insert ostensibly false text to adulterate—and so intentionally discredit—an otherwise genuine document (or likewise, an ostensibly false document into a batch of genuine documents). Such actions are covert rather than clandestine since a clandestine action, if properly conducted, remains totally concealed, which would in this instance be self-defeating.

	False information—especially in the form of fraudulent “official” documents and papers—is a potent disruptor. Just as the belief that some currency may be counterfeit undercuts faith in all currency, so, too, the belief that some documents (or some parts of some documents) are forgeries intentionally and effectively corrodes the credibility of all similar documents. This effect can be more debilitating when the target is intelligence professionals rather than lay readers.

		Alertness to deception presumably prompts a more careful and systematic review of the evidence. But anticipation of deception also leads the analyst to be more skeptical of all of the evidence, and to the extent that evidence is deemed unreliable, the analyst’s preconceptions must play a greater role in determining which evidence to believe. This leads to a paradox: The more alert we are to deception, the more likely we are to be deceived.[29]

	Disruption entails a greater degree of freedom in counterintelligence operations than mere deception. Ostensible forgeries interspersed within a larger document batch are a well-honed technique. Circulating fake and fraudulent documents, or causing false information to be published in legitimate outlets, is useful to provoke others to come forward to challenge the information or to amplify it.


Which is exactly what the dossier did:


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2017/mar/21/discredited-dossier-detailing-trump-russian-collus/
	Desperate Dems cling to discredited spy dossier to link Trump to Russians 

	By Rowan Scarborough - The Washington Times - Tuesday, March 21, 2017

	In trying to bolster a discredited dossier by a former British spy, Rep. Adam B. Schiff on Monday recounted the document’s telling of a supposed meeting between an informal Donald Trump adviser and a Russian oligarch.

	...Mr. Schiff’s praise of former MI6 agent Mr. Steele was a theme among Democrats on Monday as they questioned FBI Director James B. Comey and Navy Adm. Michael Rogers, director of the National Security Agency.

	Democrats are attempting to prove collusion between the Trump campaign and Russian intelligence, which hacked into Democrat Party emails.

	At this point, Mr. Steele’s unverified dossier is their best public evidence. They have embraced Mr. Steele’s research, which makes the case for collusion even though it has been discredited by the press, its subjects and former intelligence officials.


http://www.nationalreview.com/corner/443752/trump-kompromat-story-its-all-disturbing
	The Trump ‘Kompromat’ Story Is Disturbing — Every Bit of It

	by David French January 11, 2017 12:51 AM

	...I won’t dignify the report with a link, but some of the rumors detail alleged personal misconduct. Others detail disturbing claims of coordination between Russian intelligence and Trump campaign officials — claims that can be investigated rather easily. In fact, news organizations were investigating those claims even as Buzzfeed vomited out the entire report.

	The American people need to know what Russia is doing, what our president-elect or his team have done (if anything), and whether members of our own government are breaking the law to try to delegitimize Trump.


http://www.nationalreview.com/article/443816/donald-trump-dossier-intelligence-reports-question-russia-ties
	Is the Intelligence Community Trying to Undermine Trump?

	by Michael Barone January 13, 2017 12:00 AM @michaelbarone

	These unverified allegations are not useful for much except delegitimizing the president-elect.

	One must add that it’s not clear that “intelligence agencies” let out the information. But if they did, it was in line with the report they delivered to President Barack Obama last week claiming with high degrees of confidence that Russian president Vladimir Putin directed the hacking and release of e-mails from the Democratic National Committee and John Podesta, Hillary Clinton’s campaign chairman.

	...My ability to read the minds of leaders of the intelligence community is weaker than theirs to read Putin’s, and I lack knowledge of just how the 35-page dodgy dossier found its way into the computerized hands of BuzzFeed. But what we’re seeing looks an awful lot like an attempt by intelligence officials, probably including presidential employees, to delegitimize the president-elect and his administration. It’s in line with the warnings to Trump by Senate minority leader Chuck Schumer not to tangle with the intelligence community.


http://www.weeklystandard.com/the-sordid-history-of-the-firm-behind-the-trump-russia-dossier/article/2006254
	The Sordid History of the Firm Behind the Trump-Russia Dossier
	
	...What's interesting about this revelation is that Fusion GPS has an institutional reputation for doing shoddy and underhanded political work, and nearly all of it has been at the behest of Democrats looking to attack Republicans. 


http://insider.foxnews.com/2017/01/25/tucker-carlson-grills-buzzfeed-editor-ben-smith-unverified-donald-trump-russia-dossier
	Tucker Grills BuzzFeed Editor Who Published Trump-Russia Dossier 

	...He told Tucker that he wanted to give readers a chance to see the contents of the dossier - which had been presented to high-level government officials - and decide for themselves.

	Tucker said that journalists see unverified, unsubstantiated reports all the time, and argued that Smith was politically motivated to publicly release this particular one.

	"Clearly, BuzzFeed News has a pretty open political agenda masquerading as journalism," Tucker said. "I think you are hiding behind journalistic standards, when, in fact, they're political imperatives."


https://www.buzzfeed.com/ryanhatesthis/alt-right-trolls-are-trying-to-trick-people-into-thinking-tr
	 Alt-Right Trolls Are Trying To Trick People Into Thinking Trump Dossier Was A 4chan Prank

	Trump supporters are spreading misinformation about a dossier that was released by BuzzFeed News Tuesday full of unverified allegations against President-elect Donald Trump. 

	...It claims that a dossier full of unverified allegations that Russia has compromising information on President-elect Donald Trump, released Tuesday night by BuzzFeed News, was actually a hoax perpetrated by 4chan.

	As reported by BuzzFeed News, the dossier's source is understood to be a former British intelligence agent whose past work was described by CNN as credible and the New York Times as "a competent and reliable operative with extensive experience in Russia." 

	 ...Wilson told BuzzFeed News that he doesn't believe it's a coincidence that Trump supporters are crediting 4chan.

	"The eagerness of them grabbing on to this 4chan thing shows you that there's some nervousness," he said. "They don't want him to be the guy who was pushed over the finish line by these forces that are overt enemies of our country."

	Comments from Reddit and 4chan seem to back up the idea that Trump supporters are organizing misinformation campaigns.


http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow/watch/new-gop-defense-tactic-targets-trump-russia-dossier-936009795668
	New GOP defense tactic targets Trump Russia dossier

	Rachel Maddow points out how the Republican Party has switched to full push-back mode on the Trump Russia dossier and the overall investigation into ties between the Donald Trump campaign and Russian interference


http://www.palmerreport.com/opinion/pee-pee-tape-confirmed-fbi-used-trump-russia-dossier-to-get-fisa-warrant-on-carter-page/2351/
	 Pee Pee Tape confirmed? FBI used Trump-Russia dossier to get FISA warrant on Carter Page

	...When former MI6 agent Christopher Steele’s now infamous “Trump-Russia dossier” first leaked to the public in January of this year, much of the media treated it with great skepticism. They dismissed it as “unsubstantiated” every time they mentioned it, even as they painted far other less substantiated rumors as legitimate. Perhaps that’s because they wanted to distance themselves from one of the core claims of the dossier, now commonly referred to as the Pee Pee Tape. But the whole parameters just changed.


https://www.mediamatters.org/research/2017/04/19/pro-trump-websites-denial-after-reports-confirm-parts-trump-russia-dossier-were-corroborated/216098
	Pro-Trump Websites In Denial After Reports Confirm Parts Of Trump Russia Dossier Were Corroborated

	Fringe Outlets And Fake News Purveyors Attack FISA Court Decision By Attempting To Discredit Dossier Used As Evidence


http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/2017/01/13/donald-trump-brands-christopher-steele-failed-spy-conspired/
	President-elect Donald Trump has lashed out at the former MI6 operative who prepared a dossier claiming Russia had explosive intelligence on him as a “failed spy” as Theresa May distanced the British government from the former agent.

	Mr Trump said Chris Steele, who spent two decades with the secret service, collaborated with his political rivals to concoct “phony allegations”. He dismissed the alleged conspirators as “sleazebag political operatives”, noting that Russia has denied collecting compromising information about him.

	Mr Steele’s status as a former UK spy threatened to cause a diplomatic row, with the Russian embassy in London suggesting he was still working on behalf of the British government to damage both Mr Trump and the Kremlin.

	The Prime Minister said in a press conference on Friday that the government had nothing to do with the so-called “dirty dossier”.

	“From everything you will have seen it is absolutely clear that the individual who produced this dossier has not worked for the UK government for years,” she said.

	...Mr Steele told him he had been trusted by the FBI because, “my track record as a professional is second to none”.


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/12/intelligence-sources-vouch-credibility-donald-trump-russia-dossier-author
	Donald Trump dossier: intelligence sources vouch for author's credibility 

	Ex-MI6 officer Christopher Steele, named as writer of Donald Trump memo, is ‘highly regarded professional’

	Nick Hopkins and Luke Harding

	On Thursday night, as the former spy was in hiding, having fled his home in the south-east of England, former colleagues rallied to defend him. One described him as “very credible” – a sober, cautious and meticulous professional with a formidable record.

	The former Foreign Office official, who has known Steele for 25 years and considers him a friend, said: “The idea his work is fake or a cowboy operation is false – completely untrue. Chris is an experienced and highly regarded professional. He’s not the sort of person who will simply pass on gossip.”

	The official added: “If he puts something in a report, he believes there’s sufficient credibility in it for it to be worth considering. Chris is a very straight guy. He could not have survived in the job he was in if he had been prone to flights of fancy or doing things in an ill-considered way.”

	That is the way the CIA and the FBI, not to mention the British government, regarded him, too. It’s not hard to see why. 


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/12/parliaments-intelligence-watchdog-to-scrutinise-trump-dossier
	Pressure is only likely to increase on the government from all sides to explain whether it had any knowledge of the dossier as it was being prepared by the former MI6 officer, who has been named as Christopher Steele.

	...“It absolutely leaves Britain in a difficult position and Moscow will make the most of that.


https://www.dni.gov/index.php/newsroom/press-releases/item/1736-dni-clapper-statement-on-conversation-with-president-elect-trump
	We also discussed the private security company document, which was widely circulated in recent months among the media, members of Congress and Congressional staff even before the IC became aware of it. I emphasized that this document is not a U.S. Intelligence Community product and that I do not believe the leaks came from within the IC. 


http://www.nationalreview.com/article/443816/donald-trump-dossier-intelligence-reports-question-russia-ties
	“Fake news,” Trump charged at the news conference, turning back on his critics a meme they have been using to suggest that voters were gulled into voting for him. “I think it was disgraceful, disgraceful that the intelligence agencies allowed any information that turned out to be so false and fake out.”


http://www.foxnews.com/politics/2017/01/13/trump-sticks-knife-into-dossier-story-wont-let-intel-community-off-hook.html
	His “failed spy” slam refers to former British spy Christopher David Steele, who reportedly helped compile the dossier. Trump turned fire on the original sources of the material after slamming the media – namely CNN and BuzzFeed, the latter of which published the dossier itself – for reporting on the claims earlier this week.

	But he also has continued to question the intelligence community’s role in the sordid allegations going public, reviving his charge Friday that they “probably” released it.


http://www.foxnews.com/us/2017/03/28/fbi-scrutinized-by-congress-over-probe-into-alleged-russia-trump-link.html

	The Senate Judiciary Committee, headed by Sen. Chuck Grassley, R-Iowa, is investigating whether the FBI wrongly included political opposition research from Trump’s opponents in its probe, and then paid the author of that controversial report, a former British spy, to work for the FBI on its investigation. The committee’s probe began March 6 with the letter Grassley sent the FBI and was furthered Monday with requests for information from the company that did the opposition research.

	“When political opposition research becomes the basis for law enforcement or intelligence efforts, it raises substantial questions about the independence of law enforcement and intelligence from politics,” Grassley said Monday.

	The House Intelligence Committee, headed by Rep. Devin Nunes, R- Calif., is looking into how classified documents containing foreign surveillance transcripts with references to Trump’s transition team were illegally disclosed to the media. The committee’s probe began Jan. 25.

	...Most concerning, Grassley said, is that “Fusion GPS and Steele reportedly shared the dossier with the FBI, which then offered to pay Steele to continue his political opposition research on Trump.”

	Grassley wants to determine “the extent to which the FBI has relied on the political dossier in its investigation.” The senator also has requested documentation from Fusion GPS as to who hired and paid them, when Steele was hired, how the FBI got involved and whether Fusion GPS was aware of the FBI paying Steele. 


(Note: Grassley is usually full of shit, and the FBI could have wanted to pay the guy to cover for spying on him or just to see what he and his sources would do. That said:)


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/03/read-the-full-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey-in-which-he-discusses-clinton-email-investigation/
	GRAHAM: Do you agree with me that a fusion was involved in preparing the dossier against Donald Trump? That would be interfering in our election by the Russians?

	COMEY: I don't want to say.


This one document managed to:

- spark a political firestorm between the U.S. left and right
- politicize, distort, and discredit the narrative of Russia's meddling to help Trump and their activities in general
- strain relations between the U.S. and the U.K.
- strain relations between U.S. intelligence agencies and Trump (things would probably be going a lot better right now if Trump trusted the USIC over his "advisors")
- embarrass MI6 and the FBI
- create a scandal for the FBI and spark an investigation into their conduct


https://pastebin.com/Euj8UPt2
